Missouri, session 2026, HB1855.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 192.020, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 192.020, to read as follows:
192.020. 1. It shall be the general duty and responsibility of the department of health
and senior services to safeguard the health of the people in the state and all its subdivisions. It
shall make a study of the causes and prevention of diseases. It shall designate those diseases
which are infectious, contagious, communicable or dangerous in their nature and shall make
and enforce adequate orders, findings, rules and regulations to prevent the spread of such
diseases and to determine the prevalence of such diseases within the state. It shall have power
and authority, with approval of the director of the department, to make such orders, findings,
rules and regulations as will prevent the entrance of infectious, contagious and communicable
diseases into the state.
2. The department of health and senior services shall include in its list of
[communicable or infectious] diseases which must be reported to the department methicillin-
resistant staphylococcus aureus (MRSA), carbapenem-resistant enterobacteriaceae (CRE) as
specified by the department, [and] vancomycin-resistant enterococcus (VRE), and alpha-gal
syndrome.
3. (1) Any alpha-gal syndrome case report shall be submitted to the department
within seven days of receiving a positive laboratory confirmation. The laboratory that
finalizes the positive test result shall be responsible for submitting the report.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 1855 2
(2) A report of alpha-gal syndrome shall be required for an alpha-gal
immunoglobulin E level of greater than or equal to one-tenth of one international unit
per milliliter or greater than or equal to one-tenth of one kilounit per liter. A laboratory
that finalizes such a test result shall report the test result as a case of alpha-gal
syndrome using an electronic laboratory reporting system to be developed by the
department.
(3) Subject to appropriations, the department of health and senior services may
follow up on reported cases of alpha-gal syndrome by applying an appropriate random
sampling method for confirmation that the cases meet the most current Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention surveillance case definition of alpha-gal syndrome.
Reporting under this subdivision shall commence no later than six months after the
effective date of this section.
(4) The department of health and senior services shall submit an annual report
to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention summarizing its findings related to
the reporting and incidence of alpha-gal syndrome.
✔